Montana, session 2025, HB728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Prohibition on campaign contributions from public entities. (1) It is
unlawful for a public entity, directly or through an intermediary, to make a disbursement for an electioneering
communication, a contribution, or an expenditure, or to make an express or implied promise to make a
contribution or an expenditure, in connection with a candidate's campaign.
(2) It is unlawful for a candidate to solicit, accept, or receive a contribution, expenditure, or
disbursement described in subsection (1) from a public entity.
(3) An individual who violates subsection (1) or (2) is liable in a civil action pursuant to 13-37-128.
(4) The prohibitions in subsections (1) and (2) do not apply to individual public employees.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "public entity" means any public association or group, union,
hospital, nongovernmental organization, nonprofit, school district, or municipality that receives state or federal
funding.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 13, chapter 37, part 2, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 37, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 728